Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 2 Payment of Interest and Expenses

Cross references.

Fiduciary powers of financial institutions generally, §

7-1-310

et seq.

Foreign guardians generally, §

29-2-74

et seq.

53-12-390.
Payment of interest on pecuniary amount.

If a beneficiary is to receive a pecuniary amount outright from a trust after an income interest ends, and no interest is provided for by the terms of the trust, the pecuniary amount usually bears interest at the legal rate after the expiration of 12 months from the date the income interest terminates.

The general rule in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subservient to the equity and necessity of a particular case.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-390

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-391.
Payment of expenses.

Expenses incurred in connection with the settlement of a decedent’s estate or the winding up of a terminating income interest, including interest and penalties concerning taxes, fees of attorneys and personal representatives and trustees, and court costs, may be charged against the principal or income in the discretion of the personal representative or trustee.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-391

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.